District of Columbia statutes.
1-629.02

Erroneous payments to employees.

When the Mayor determines that an employee or former employee of the District is indebted to the District of Columbia government (“government”) because of an erroneous payment made to or on behalf of the employee, the Mayor may, after 30 days notice to the employee, collect the amount of the indebtedness as provided in this subchapter.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2902
as added Sept. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-144, § 2(c), 33 DCR 4383

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-629.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-630.2.